California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(A) The agreement is on the same terms and conditions as the offer made to the large electrical corporation pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) If the agreement is on different financial terms and conditions from the offer that was initially rejected by the large electrical corporation, the property insurer has first made an offer on those new terms and conditions to the large electrical corporation pursuant to paragraph (1), and the large electrical corporation has rejected that offer.

(5) An agreement for the sale, assignment, or transfer of the right described in this subdivision between a property insurer and a third-party entity that fails to conform to the requirements
 of this subdivision shall be void and unenforceable.

(c) (1) Any agreement and exchange of information, including the offers made or documentation or other evidence submitted for purposes of reviewing, approving, or denying offers and any acceptance or rejection of an offer made to or by a large electrical corporation, pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be subject to a nondisclosure agreement and shall not be disclosed unless any of the following applies:

(A) Disclosure shall be made to the administrator or a public agency to the extent required by law. Information disclosed pursuant to this subparagraph is not a public writing and shall not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) or any other law.

(B) For a property insurer, disclosure to a third-party insurer or reinsurer that is a party to a contract with the property insurer related to the right if the person or entity to whom disclosure is made agrees to the same nondisclosure terms.

(C) Internal disclosure as necessary for internal business purposes, including, but not limited to, underwriting if the person or entity to whom disclosure is made agrees to the same nondisclosure terms.

(2) Any agreement and exchange of information, including an offer made or documentation or other evidence submitted for purposes of reviewing, approving, or denying offers and any acceptance or rejection of an offer made to an electrical corporation, pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be admissible, and shall not be used, subject to discovery or compulsion, in any proceeding,
 including civil litigation, except for a judicial or administrative proceeding involving either of the following:

(A) An action to enforce the agreement following a breach of the agreement between the large electrical corporation and the property insurer entered into pursuant to this section.

(B) A violation of this section.

(d) An agreement between a property insurer and a third party entity shall not provide for financial participation by the third-party entity in an agreement entered into between the property insurer and a large electrical corporation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) A nondisclosure agreement between a property insurer and a third-party entity prohibiting the disclosure of the terms and conditions of an offer for an agreement subject
 to this section shall not prohibit the disclosure of those terms and conditions to the large electrical corporation as required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). A large electrical corporation to which those terms and conditions are disclosed shall not disclose that information to any third-party that is not subject to the nondisclosure agreement.

(f) This section does not apply to a California domestic insurer if its annual property line direct written premiums are less than three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 47.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.5. CALIFORNIA CONSUMER POWER AND CONSERVATION FINANCING AUTHORITY ACT [3300. - 3383.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [3300. - 3304.]

3300.

The Legislature finds and declares that in order to furnish the citizens of California with reliable, affordable electrical power, to ensure sufficient power reserves, to assure stability and rationality in California’s electricity market, to encourage energy efficiency and conservation as well as the use of renewable energy resources, and to protect the public health, welfare, and safety, the state needs to finance, purchase, lease, own, operate, acquire, or otherwise provide financial assistance for public and private facilities for the generation and transmission
 of electricity and for renewable energy, energy efficiency, and conservation programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

As used in this division, unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Act” means the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority Act.

(b) “Authority” means the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority established pursuant to Section 3320 and any board, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the functions thereof, or to whom the powers
 conferred upon the authority by this division shall be given by law.

(c) “Board” means the Board of Directors of the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority.

(d) “Bond purchase agreement” means a contractual agreement executed between the authority and an underwriter or underwriters and, where appropriate, a participating party, whereby the authority agrees to sell bonds issued pursuant to this division.

(e) “Bonds” means bonds, including structured, senior, and subordinated bonds or other securities; loans; notes, including bond revenue or grant anticipation notes; certificates of indebtedness; commercial paper; floating rate and variable maturity securities; and any other evidences of indebtedness or ownership, including certificates of participation or beneficial interest, asset backed
 certificates, or lease-purchase or installment purchase agreements, whether taxable or excludable from gross income for state and federal income taxation purposes.

(f) “Cost,” as applied to a program, project, or portion thereof financed under this division, means all or any part of the cost of construction, improvement, repair, reconstruction, renovation, and acquisition of all lands, structures, improved or unimproved real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, licenses, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project; the cost of demolishing or removing or relocating any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which the buildings or structures may be moved; the cost of all machinery and equipment; financing charges; the costs of any environmental mitigation; the costs of issuance of bonds or other indebtedness; interest prior to, during, and for a period after,
 completion of the project, as determined by the authority; provisions for working capital; reserves for principal and interest; reserves for reduction of costs for loans or other financial assistance; reserves for maintenance, extension, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements; and the cost of architectural, engineering, financial, appraisal, and legal services, plans, specifications, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility of any project, enterprise, or program or incidental to the completion or financing of any project or program.

(g) “Enterprise” means a revenue-producing improvement, building, system, plant, works, facilities, or undertaking used for or useful for the generation or production of electric energy for lighting, heating, and power for public or private uses. Enterprise includes, but is not limited to, all parts of the enterprise,
 all appurtenances to it, lands, easements, rights in land, water rights, contract rights, franchises, buildings, structures, improvements, equipment, and facilities appurtenant or relating to the enterprise.

(h) “Financial assistance” in connection with a project, enterprise or program, includes, but is not limited to, any combination of grants, loans, the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority, insurance, guarantees or other credit enhancements or liquidity facilities, and contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value, as may be approved by resolution of the board; the purchase or retention of authority bonds, the bonds of a participating party for their retention or for sale by the authority, or the issuance of authority bonds or the bonds of a special purpose trust used to fund the cost of a project or program for which a participating party is directly or indirectly liable, including, but not limited to, bonds, the
 security for which is provided in whole or in part pursuant to the powers granted by this division; bonds for which the authority has provided a guarantee or enhancement; or any other type of assistance determined to be appropriate by the authority.

(i) “Fund” means the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority Fund.

(j) “Loan agreement” means a contractual agreement executed between the authority and a participating party that provides that the authority will loan funds to the participating party and that the participating party will repay the principal and pay the interest and redemption premium, if any, on the loan.

(k) “Participating party” means either of the following:

(1) Any person, company, corporation, partnership, firm,
 federally recognized California Indian tribe, or other entity or group of entities, whether organized for profit or not for profit, engaged in business or operations within the state and that applies for financial assistance from the authority for the purpose of implementing a project or program in a manner prescribed by the authority.

(2) Any subdivision of the state or local government, including, but not limited to, departments, agencies, commissions, cities, counties, nonprofit corporations, special districts, assessment districts, and joint powers authorities within the state or any combination of these subdivisions, that has, or proposes to acquire, an interest in a project, or that operates or proposes to operate a program under Section 3365, and that makes application to the authority for financial assistance in a manner prescribed by the authority.

(l) “Program”
 means a program that provides financial assistance, as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 3365).

(m) “Project” means plants, facilities, equipment, appliances, structures, expansions, and improvements within the state that serve the purposes of this division as approved by the authority, and all activities and expenses necessary to initiate and complete those projects described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 3350) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 3368), of Chapter 3.

(n) “Revenues” means all receipts, purchase payments, loan repayments, lease payments, rents, fees and charges, and all other income or receipts derived by the authority from an enterprise, or by the authority or a participating party from any other financing arrangement undertaken by the authority or a participating party, including, but not limited to, all receipts from a bond purchase
 agreement, and any income or revenue derived from the investment of any money in any fund or account of the authority or a participating party.

(o) “State” means the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.

Any action taken pursuant to this division is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act, as defined in Section 11370 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Purpose of the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority [3310. - 3310.]

3310.

The authority may only exercise its powers pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 3340) of Chapter 3 for the following purposes:

(a) Establish, finance, purchase, lease, own, operate, acquire, or construct generating facilities and other projects and enterprises, on its own or through agreements with public and private third parties or joint ventures with public or private entities, or provide financial assistance for projects or programs by participating parties, to supplement private and public sector power supplies, taking into account generation facilities in operation or under development as of
 August 13, 2001, and to ensure a sufficient and reliable supply of electricity for California’s consumers at just and reasonable rates.

(b) Sponsor, finance, purchase, lease, own, operate, acquire, or construct an eligible transmission project, as defined in Section 63049.71 of the Government Code.

(c) Finance programs, administered by the Energy Commission, the commission, and other approved participating parties for consumers and businesses to invest in
 cost-effective energy efficient appliances, renewable energy projects, and other programs that will reduce the demand for energy in California.

(d) Finance natural gas transportation and storage projects under Article 7 (commencing with Section 3368) of Chapter 3.

(e) Achieve an adequate energy reserve capacity in California within
 five years of
 August 13, 2001.

(f) Provide financing for owners of aged, inefficient, electric powerplants to perform necessary retrofits to improve the efficiency and environmental performances of those powerplants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 48.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. The California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority [3320. - 3369.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Creation of the Authority [3320. - 3320.]

3320.

(a) There is hereby created in the state government the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority, which shall be responsible for administering this division.

(b) The authority shall implement the purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3310), and to that end finance projects and programs in accordance with this division, all to the mutual benefit of the people of the state and to protect their health, welfare, and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Board of Directors [3325. - 3328.]

3325.

(a) The authority shall be governed by a five-member board of directors that shall consist of the following persons:

(1) Four individuals appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. These four members shall have considerable experience in power generation, natural gas transportation or storage, energy conservation, financing, or ratepayer advocacy.

(2) The State Treasurer.

(b) (1) For the initial term, the appointed members shall serve staggered terms as follows:

(A) The member appointed first shall serve a term of four years.

(B) The member appointed second shall serve a term of three years.

(C) The member appointed third shall serve a term of two years.

(D) The member appointed fourth shall serve a term of one year.

(2) The second and any subsequent terms shall be for four years.

(c) A quorum is necessary for any action to be taken by the board. Three of the members shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of three board members shall be necessary for any action to be taken by the board.

(d) (1) The chairperson of the board shall be appointed by the Governor. This position shall be a full-time, paid position.

(2) Except as provided in this subdivision, the members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties to the extent that reimbursement for these expenses is not otherwise provided or payable by another public agency, and shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each full day of attending meetings of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3326.

(a) The members of the board shall be subject to the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000)) of the Government Code, and all other applicable provisions of law.

(b) The board may purchase insurance for its fiduciaries or for itself to cover liability or losses occurring by reason of the act or omission of a fiduciary, if the insurance permits recourse by the insurer against the fiduciary in the case of a breach of a fiduciary obligation by the fiduciary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3327.

Meetings of the board shall be open to the public and shall be conducted in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3328.

The California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) applies to all records of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 399.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Chief Executive Officer [3330. - 3330.]

3330.

The chief executive officer shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of the authority and the fund subject to the direction of the board. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board may assign to the executive director, by resolution, those duties generally necessary or convenient to carry out its powers and purposes under this division. Any action involving final approval of any bonds, notes, loans, or other financial assistance shall require the approval of a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers of the Authority [3340. - 3347.]

3340.

The authority is authorized and empowered to do any of the following:

(a) Adopt an official seal.

(b) Sue and be sued in its own name.

(c) Employ or contract with officers and employees to administer the authority. The authority may contract for the services of a chief executive officer, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. If the chief executive officer contracts
 for the services of any other officer or employee, the contract shall be subject to the approval of the board.

(d) Exercise the power of eminent domain.

(e) Adopt rules and regulations for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(f)Do all things generally necessary or convenient to carry out its powers under, and the purposes of, this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1124, Sec. 51.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

3341.

In connection with the purposes of this division, the authority may do any or all of the following:

(a) Issue bonds, from time to time, as further provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3380.1), to pay all or part of the cost of any enterprise, project, or program, or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this division.

(b) Enter into joint powers agreements with eligible public agencies pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with
 Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) Subject to any statutory or constitutional limitation on their use, do any of the following as may, in the determination of the authority, be necessary or convenient for the successful development, conduct, or financing of a project, program, or enterprise, or for carrying out the purposes of this division:

(1) Engage the services, including, without limitation, the services of private consultants; attorneys; financial professionals and advisors; engineers; architects; construction, land use and environmental experts; and accountants, to render professional and technical assistance and advice.

(2) Contract for engineering, architectural, accounting, or other services of appropriate state agencies.

(3) Pay the reasonable costs, including, without limitation, costs of consulting engineers, architects, accountants, and construction, land use, and environmental experts employed by the authority or any participating party. Except as otherwise provided in Section 3341.5, those costs shall be recovered from participating parties.

(d) Acquire, lease, take title to, and sell by installment sale or otherwise, lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands that are located within the state, as the authority determines to be necessary or convenient for an enterprise or the financing of a project, upon terms and conditions the authority considers to be reasonable.

(e) Make, receive, or serve as a conduit for the making of, or otherwise provide for, grants, contributions, guarantees, insurance, credit
 enhancements or liquidity facilities, or other financial enhancements to a participating party as financial assistance for a project or program. The sources may include bond proceeds, dedicated taxes, state appropriations, federal appropriations, federal grants and loan funds, public and private sector retirement system funds, and proceeds of loans from the Pooled Money Investment Account, or any other source of money, property, labor, or other things of value.

(f) Make loans to any participating party, either directly or by making a loan to a lending institution or other financial intermediary, in connection with the financing of a project or program in accordance with an agreement between the authority and a participating party, either as a sole lender or in participation with other lenders.

(g) Make loans to any participating party, either directly or by making a loan to a
 lending institution, in accordance with an agreement between the authority and the participating party to refinance indebtedness incurred by the participating party in connection with projects undertaken and completed prior to any agreement with the authority or expectation that the authority would provide financing, either as a sole lender or in participation with other lenders. The power generated by those projects shall be subject to the terms and conditions specified by the authority in the agreement and pursuant to Section 3351.

(h) Mortgage all or any portion of the authority’s interest in a project or enterprise and the property on which any project or enterprise is located, whether owned or thereafter acquired, including the granting of a security interest in any property, tangible or intangible.

(i) Assign or pledge all or any portion of the authority’s interest in
 assets, things of value, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds, bond purchase agreements, loan agreements, indentures of mortgage or trust, or similar instruments, notes, and security interests in property, tangible or intangible and the revenues therefrom, of a participating party to which the authority has made loans, and the revenues therefrom, including payment or income from any interest owned or held by the authority, for the benefit of the holders of bonds.

(j) Lease the project being financed to a participating party, upon terms and conditions that the authority deems proper; charge and collect rents therefor; terminate any lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations thereof; include in any lease, if desired, provisions that the lessee shall have options to renew the lease for a period or periods, and at rents determined by the authority; purchase any or all of the project; or, upon payment of all the
 indebtedness incurred by the authority for the financing of the project, the authority may convey, any or all of the project to the lessee or lessees. The power generated by those projects shall be subject to the terms and conditions specified by the authority in the agreement and pursuant to Section 3351.

(k) (1) Issue, obtain, or aid in obtaining, from any department or agency of the United States, from other agencies of the state, or from any private company, any insurance or guarantee to or for, or any letter or line of credit regarding, the payment or repayment of interest or principal, or both, or any part thereof, on any bond, loan, lease, or obligation or any instrument evidencing or securing the same, made or entered into pursuant to this division.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, enter into any agreement, contract or other
 instrument regarding any insurance, guarantee, letter or line of credit specified in paragraph (1), and accept payment in the manner and form provided therein in the event of default by a participating party.

(3) Assign any insurance, guarantee, letter or line of credit specified in paragraph (1) as security for bonds issued by the authority.

(l) Enter into any agreement or contract, execute any instrument, and perform any act or thing necessary or convenient to, directly or indirectly, secure the authority’s bonds or a participating party’s obligations to the authority, including, but not limited to, bonds of a participating party purchased by the authority for retention or sale, with funds or moneys that are legally available and that are due or payable to the participating party by reason of any grant, allocation, apportionment, or appropriation of the state or agencies
 thereof, to the extent that the Controller shall be the custodian at any time of these funds or moneys, or with funds or moneys that are or will be legally available to the participating party, the authority, or the state or any agencies thereof by reason of any grant, allocation, apportionment, or appropriation of the federal government or agencies thereof; and in the event of written notice that the participating party has not paid or is in default on its obligations to the authority, direct the Controller to withhold payment of those funds or moneys from the participating party over which it is or will be custodian and to pay the same to the authority or its assignee, or direct the state or any agencies thereof to which any grant, allocation, apportionment, or appropriation of the federal government or agencies thereof is or will be legally available to pay the same upon receipt to the authority or its assignee, until the default has been cured and the amounts then due and unpaid have been paid to the
 authority or its assignee, or until arrangements satisfactory to the authority have been made to cure the default.

(m) Purchase, with the proceeds of the authority’s bonds, bonds issued by, or for the benefit of, any participating party in connection with a project, pursuant to a bond purchase agreement or otherwise. Bonds purchased pursuant to this division may be held by the authority, pledged or assigned by the authority, or sold to public or private purchasers at public or negotiated sale, in whole or in part, separately or together with other bonds issued by the authority, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, may be bought by the authority at private sale.

(n) Enter into purchase and sale agreements with all entities, public and private, including state and local government pension funds, with respect to the sale or purchase of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3341.1.

In connection with an enterprise, the authority may do any or all of the following:

(a) Acquire any enterprise by gift, purchase, or eminent domain as necessary to achieve the purposes of the authority pursuant to Sections 3310 and 3352.

(b) Construct or improve any enterprise. By gift, lease, purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise, it may acquire any real or personal property, for an enterprise, except that no property of a state public
 body may be acquired without its consent. The authority may sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property or any interest in such property. It may lay out, open, extend, widen, straighten, establish, or change the grade of any real property or public rights-of-way necessary or convenient for any enterprise.

(c) Operate, maintain, repair, or manage all or any part of any enterprise, including the leasing for commercial purposes of surplus space or other space that is not economic to use for such enterprise.

(d) Adopt reasonable rules or regulations for the conduct of the enterprise.

(e) Prescribe, revise, and collect charges for the services, facilities, or energy furnished by the enterprise. The charges shall be established and adjusted so as to provide funds
 sufficient with other revenues and moneys available therefor, if any, to (1) pay the principal of and interest on outstanding bonds of the authority financing such enterprise as the same shall become due and payable, (2) create and maintain reserves, including, without limitation, operating and maintenance reserves and reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing such bonds, and (3) pay operating and administrative costs of the authority.

(f) Execute all instruments, perform all acts, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3341.2.

In connection with a project, the authority may do any or all of the following:

(a) Determine the location and character of any project to be financed under this division.

(b) Acquire, construct, enlarge, remodel, renovate, alter, improve, furnish, equip, own, maintain, manage, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, or regulate any project to be financed under this division.

(c) Contract with any participating party for the construction of a project by such participating party.

(d) Enter into leases and agreements, as lessor or lessee, with any participating party relating to the acquisition, construction, and installation of any project, including real property, buildings, equipment, and facilities of any kind or character.

(e) Establish, revise, charge and collect rates, rents, fees and charges for a project. The rates, rents, fees, and charges shall be established and adjusted in respect of the aggregate rates, rents, fees, and charges from all projects so as to provide funds sufficient with other revenues and moneys available therefor, if any, to (1) pay the principal of and interest on outstanding bonds of the authority financing such project as the same shall become due and payable, (2) create and maintain reserves, including,
 without limitation, operating and maintenance reserves and reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing such bonds, and (3) pay operating and administrative costs of the authority.

(f) Enter into contracts of sale with any participating party covering any project financed by the authority.

(g) As an alternative to leasing or selling a project to a participating party, finance the acquisition, construction, or installation of a project by means of a loan to the participating party.

(h) Execute all instruments, perform all acts, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3341.5.

In connection with the purposes of this division, the authority shall charge and equitably apportion among participating parties or other public or private entities the authority’s administrative costs and expenses, including operating and financing-related costs incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this division, except to the extent that those costs are related to one of the authority’s own enterprises or projects, in which case costs shall be included in the cost of generating that electricity as provided in Section
 3351.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3342.

The fiscal powers granted to the authority by this division may be exercised without regard or reference to any other department, division, or agency of the state, except the Legislature or as otherwise stated in this division. This division shall be deemed to provide an alternative method of doing the things authorized by this division, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3343.

No member of the board or any person executing bonds of the authority pursuant to this division shall be personally liable on the bonds or subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3344.

All expenses incurred in carrying out this division shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this division and no liability or obligation shall be imposed upon the State of California and, none shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided under this division. Under no circumstances shall the authority create any debt, liability, or obligation on the part of the State of California payable from any source whatsoever other than the moneys provided under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3345.

The authority’s operating budget shall be subject to review and appropriation in the annual Budget Act. For purposes of this section, the authority’s operating budget shall include the costs of personnel, administration, and overhead.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3347.

The Bureau of State Audits shall perform an evaluation of the effectiveness of the authority’s efforts in achieving its purposes as described in Section 3310. The evaluation shall include recommendations as to whether there is a continued need for the authority beyond January 1, 2007. The evaluation shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Generation Facilities [3350. - 3356.]

3350.

In evaluating the eligibility for financing of additional generation facilities, the authority shall utilize the Energy Commission’s and the Independent System Operator’s, or their successor’s, information relating to the need for additional generating facilities and their forecasts of electric supply and demand for the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 194.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3351.

(a) All generation-related projects and enterprises financed pursuant to this division shall provide electricity to the consumers of this state at the cost of generating that electricity, including the costs of financing those projects or enterprises. To the extent that electricity is not needed in the state, or that it is financially advantageous to California consumers, the electricity may be sold outside the state at just and reasonable rates.

(b) If a participating party is an electrical corporation, the commission shall determine the cost of generating electricity and to which entities the electricity is sold.

(c) If a participating party is a local publicly owned electric utility seeking to provide electricity to consumers in its service territory, the governing board of that utility shall determine the cost of generating electricity and to which entities the electricity is sold.

(d) If neither subdivision (b) nor subdivision (c) applies, the authority shall determine the cost of generating electricity and to which entities the electricity is sold, consistent with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3352.

In addition to the other powers provided in this division, the activities of the authority under this article are intended to supplement private and public sector power supplies, taking into account generation facilities in operation or under development as of the effective date of this section, consistent with achieving reasonable energy capacity reserves within five years of the effective date of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3353.

The authority shall have the authority to receive and act on applications for financial assistance from owners of existing powerplants whose owners or operators commit to undertake capacity expansion through facility retrofits, new construction, or both, that will improve the efficiency and environmental performance of generation facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3354.

All generation facilities constructed or improved pursuant to this division shall comply with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3355.

The authority may not invest in any nuclear facilities or develop additional hydroelectric facilities without first receiving specific statutory authorization to do so on a project-by-project basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3356.

(a) If the authority determines under Section 3350 that additional electric generation supply is required to meet the purposes of this division, the authority may undertake the following activities to ensure that the authority, or any participating party, is able to build, own, and operate generation facilities as part of a least cost electric supply policy:

(1) Identify suitable sites for the construction of generation facilities, taking into account fuel supply, interconnection, community, and environmental factors.
